Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 90.48.080 and 1987 c 109 s 126 are each amended to read as follows:It shall be unlawful for any person to throw, drain, run, or otherwise discharge into any of the waters of this state, or to cause, permit or suffer to be thrown, run, drained, allowed to seep or otherwise discharged into such waters any organic or inorganic matter that shall cause ((or tend to cause)) pollution of such waters according to the determination of the department, as provided for in this chapter.--- END ---